Mississippi, session 2026, HB907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-367, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-367.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided by Sections 23-15-974 through 23-15-985 and subsection (2) of this section,  the size, print and quality of paper of the official ballot is left to the discretion of the officer charged with printing the official ballot. (2)  The titles for the various offices shall be listed in the following order: (a)  Candidates, electors or delegates for the following national offices: (i)  President; (ii)  United States Senator or United States Representative; (b)  Candidates for the following statewide office:  Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Commissioner of Insurance; (c)  Candidates for the following state district offices:  Mississippi Transportation Commissioner, Public Service Commissioner, District Attorney; (d)  Candidates for the following legislative offices:  Senate and House of Representatives; (e)  Candidates for countywide office; (f)  Candidates for county district office. The order in which the titles for the various offices are listed within paragraphs (e) and (f) is left to the discretion of the county election commissioners.  Nominees of the political parties, qualified to conduct primary elections as defined in Section 23-15-291, shall be listed first alphabetically by the candidate's last name, followed by any other candidates listed alphabetically by last name. (3)  It is the duty of the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, to furnish the designated election commissioner of each county a sample of the official ballot, not less than * * *fifty‑five (55) sixty (60) days before the election, the general form of which shall be followed as nearly as practicable.  However, if the deadline to certify a primary election runoff, and the subsequent qualification of the person selected as the party nominee at that primary election runoff, causes the Secretary of State to be unable to furnish the sample of the official ballot in the timeframe required under this subsection, the Secretary of State shall publish a sample of the official ballot as soon as practicable. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.